Hawaii statutes.
§141-4 Weights of coffee; rules. The
department of agriculture may make rules respecting the weighing of coffee
prior to its shipment to points outside the State, and providing for the
certification of weights thereof. Further, a reasonable schedule of fees to
defray the expense of administering this section shall be established by the
department, which fees shall be collected and deposited with the state director
of finance to the credit of the general fund; provided that the department
shall consult the appropriate industries, organizations, and agencies prior to
the promulgation of the rules. [L 1955, JR 38, §1; RL 1955, §18-15.5; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §§14, 22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; am L 1963, c 114, §1 and c 193,
§6; HRS §141-4]

Cross References

Measurement
standards, see chapter 486.

Rulemaking procedure,
see chapter 91.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next